California statutes. Education Code
(d) The governing board of each district shall maintain a list indicating the number of current employees, except secondary school pupils employed in a temporary or part-time position by the governing board of the school district having jurisdiction over the school they attend, who have not completed the requirements of this section. The Department of Justice shall process these cards within 30 working days of their receipt and any cards in its possession on the date of the amendment of this section by Assembly Bill 1610 of the 1997–98 Regular Session within 30 working days of that date. School districts that have previously submitted identification cards for current employees to either the Department of Justice or the Federal Bureau of Investigation shall not be required to further implement the provisions of this section as it applies to those employees.

(e) A plea or verdict of guilty or a finding of guilt by a court in a trial without a jury or forfeiture of bail is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this section, irrespective of a subsequent order under the provisions of Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing the withdrawal of the plea of guilty and entering of a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusations or information.

(f) (1) The school district shall provide the means whereby the fingerprint cards may be completed and may charge a fee determined by the Department of Justice to be sufficient to reimburse the department for the costs incurred in processing the application. The amount of the fee shall be forwarded to the Department of Justice with the required copies of applicant’s fingerprint cards. The governing board may collect a reasonable fee payable to the local public law enforcement agency taking the fingerprints and completing the data on the fingerprint cards. In no event shall the fee exceed the actual costs incurred by the agency.

(2) The additional fees shall be transmitted to the city or county treasury. If an applicant is subsequently hired by the board within 30 days of the application, the fee may be reimbursed to the applicant. Funds not reimbursed to applicants shall be credited to the general fund of the district. If the fingerprint cards forwarded to the Department of Justice are those of a person already in the employ of the governing board, the district shall pay the fee required by this section, which fee shall be a proper charge against the general fund of the district, and no fee shall be charged the employee.

(g) This section applies to substitute and temporary employees regardless of length of employment.

(h) Subdivision (c) of this section shall not apply to a person to be employed if a school district determines that an emergency or an exceptional situation exists, and that a delay in filling the position in which the person would be employed would endanger pupil health or safety.

(i) Where reasonable access to the statewide, electronic fingerprinting network is available, the Department of Justice may mandate electronic submission of the fingerprints and related information required by this section.

(j) A school district shall request subsequent arrest service from the Department of Justice as provided under Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code.

(k) All information obtained from the Department of Justice is confidential. Each agency handling Department of Justice information shall ensure the following:

(1) No recipient may disclose its contents or provide copies of information.

(2) Information received shall be stored in a locked file separate from other files, and shall only be accessible to the custodian of records.

(3) Information received shall be destroyed upon the hiring determination in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 708 of Title 11 of the California Code of Regulations.

(4) Compliance with destruction, storage, dissemination, auditing, backgrounding, and training requirements as set forth in Sections 700 through 708, inclusive, of Title 11 of the California Code of Regulations and Section 11077 of the Penal Code governing the use and security of criminal offender record information is the responsibility of the entity receiving the information from the Department of Justice.

(l) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Department of Justice shall process pursuant to this section all requests from a school district, an employer, or a human resource agency for criminal history information on a volunteer to be used in a school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 78, Sec. 31.   Effective July 7, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

45125.01.

(a) If a person is an applicant for employment, or is employed on a part-time or substitute basis, in a position not requiring certification qualifications, or is a noncertificated candidate assuming a paid or volunteer position in accordance with Section 49024, in multiple school districts within a county or within contiguous counties, the
 school districts may agree among themselves to designate a single district, or a county superintendent may agree to act on behalf of participating districts within the county or contiguous counties, for the purposes of performing the following duties:

(1) Sending fingerprints to the Department of Justice.

(2) Receiving reports of convictions of serious and violent felonies, criminal history records, and reports of subsequent arrests from the Department of Justice.

(3) Maintaining common lists of persons eligible for employment.

(b) The school district or county superintendent serving in the capacity authorized in subdivision (a) shall be considered the employer for purposes of subdivisions (a) and (f) of Section 45125.

(c) Upon receipt from the Department of Justice of a report of conviction of a serious or violent felony, the designated school district or county superintendent shall communicate that fact to the participating districts and remove the affected employee from the common list of persons eligible for employment.

(d) Upon receipt from the Department of Justice of a criminal history record or report of subsequent arrest for any person on a common list of persons eligible for employment, the designated school district or county superintendent shall give notice to the superintendent of any participating district or a person designated in writing by that superintendent, that the report is available for inspection on a confidential basis by the superintendent or authorized designee, at the office of the designated school district or county superintendent, for a period of 30 days following receipt of notice to enable the employing school district to determine whether the
 employee meets that district’s criteria for continued employment. The designated school district or county superintendent shall not release a copy of that information to any participating district or any other person, shall retain or dispose of the information in the manner required by law after all participating districts have had an opportunity to inspect it in accordance with this section, and shall maintain a record of all persons to whom the information has been shown that shall be available to the Department of Justice to monitor compliance with the requirements of confidentiality contained in this section.

(e) Any agency processing Department of Justice responses pursuant to this section shall submit an interagency agreement to the Department of Justice to establish authorization to submit and receive information pursuant to this section.

(f) All information obtained from the Department of Justice is confidential. Every agency handling Department
 of Justice information shall ensure the following:

(1) A recipient shall not disclose its contents or provide copies of information.

(2) Information received shall be stored in a locked file separate from other files, and shall only be accessible to the custodian of records.

(3) Information received shall be destroyed upon the hiring determination in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 708 of Title 11 of the California Code of Regulations.

(4) Compliance with destruction, storage, dissemination,
 auditing, backgrounding, and training requirements as set forth in Sections 701 to 708, inclusive, of Title 11 of the California Code of Regulations and Section 11077 of the Penal Code governing the use and security of criminal offender record information is the responsibility of the entity receiving the information from the Department of Justice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 52, Sec. 1.   (AB 346)   Effective July 9, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

45125.1.

(a) Any entity that has a contract with a local educational agency shall ensure that any employee who interacts with pupils has a valid criminal records summary as described in Section 44237. When the contracting entity performs the criminal background check, it shall immediately provide any subsequent arrest and conviction information it receives to any local educational agency that it is contracting with pursuant to the subsequent arrest service.

(b) (1) This section does not apply to an entity providing services to a local educational agency, as described in subdivision (a), in an emergency or exceptional situation, such as when pupil health or safety is
 endangered or when repairs are needed to make school facilities safe and habitable.

(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), an employee of any entity that has a contract with a local educational agency, and that offers work experience opportunities for pupils, including, but not limited to, opportunities pursuant to Section 51760, 52336, 52372, 52410, or 52460, Article 1 (commencing with Section 52300), Article 5 (commencing with Section 52381), or Article 7 (commencing with Section 52450) of Chapter 9 of Part 28 of Division 4, Chapter 16.5 (commencing with Section 53070) of Part 28 of Division 4, Article 5 (commencing with Section 54690) of Chapter 9 of Part 29 of Division 4, or Part 54.5 (commencing with Section 88820) of Division 7 of Title 3, or workplace placements as part of a pupil’s individualized education program, including, but not
 limited to, the services described in Article 3 (commencing with Section 56470) of Chapter 4.5 of Part 30 of Division 4, is not required to have a valid criminal records summary pursuant to subdivision (a) if all of the following requirements are met:

(A) At least one adult employee in the workplace during the pupil’s work hours, who has direct contact with the pupil and has been designated by the employer as the employee of record who is responsible for the safety of the pupil, has a valid criminal records summary as described in Section 44237.

(B) A staff representative of the local educational agency makes visitations as specified in a pupil’s individualized education program, or, if unspecified, at least once every three weeks to consult with the pupil’s workplace liaison,
 observe the pupil at the workplace, and check in with the pupil to ensure the pupil’s health, safety, and welfare, including by addressing any concerns the pupil has raised.

(C) The parent or guardian of the pupil has signed a consent form regarding the pupil’s work placement, attesting that the parent or guardian understands the duties assigned to the pupil and the nature of the workplace environment.

(3) If a pupil participates in services provided by a contractor as part of an independent study program and the pupil is under the immediate supervision and control of the pupil’s parent or guardian during the provision of those services, the local educational agency shall do either of the following:

(A) Verify
 completion of a valid criminal records summary for all employees of the contractor who interact with the pupil.

(B) Ensure that the parent or guardian of the pupil has signed a consent form before the pupil’s interaction with a person employed by the contractor, attesting that the parent or guardian understands that the person employed by the contractor has not completed a valid criminal records summary as described in Section 44237.

(c) On a case-by-case basis, a local educational agency may require an entity with whom it has a contract to comply with the requirements of this section for employees in addition to those described in subdivision (a). The entity shall prepare and submit those employee’s fingerprints to the Department of Justice, as described in subdivision (a).

(d) (1) The Department of Justice shall ascertain whether the individual whose fingerprints were submitted to it pursuant to subdivision (a), (c), or (h) has been arrested or convicted of any crime insofar as that fact can be ascertained from information available to the Department of Justice. When the Department of Justice ascertains that an individual whose fingerprints were submitted to it pursuant to subdivision (a), (c), or (h) has a pending criminal proceeding for a felony as defined in Section 45122.1 or has been convicted of a felony as defined in Section 45122.1, the Department of Justice shall notify the employer designated by the individual of that fact.

(2) The Department of Justice, at its discretion, may notify the local educational agencies in
 instances when the employee is defined as having a pending criminal proceeding described in Section 45122.1 or has been convicted of a felony as defined in Section 45122.1.

(3) A request for records pursuant to this section shall be conducted pursuant to Section 11105.3 of the Penal Code. The Department of Justice shall provide a state and federal response pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(e) (1) An entity having a contract as described in subdivision (a) or that is required to comply with this section for other employees pursuant to subdivision (c) shall not permit an employee to interact with pupils until the Department of Justice has ascertained that the employee has not been convicted of a felony as defined in Section
 45122.1.

(2) The prohibition in paragraph (1) does not apply to an employee solely on the basis that the employee has been convicted of a felony if the employee has obtained a certificate of rehabilitation and pardon pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 4852.01) of Title 6 of Part 3 of the Penal Code.

(3) The prohibition in paragraph (1) does not apply to an employee solely on the basis that the employee has been convicted of a serious felony that is not also a violent felony if that employee can prove to the sentencing court of the offense in question, by clear and convincing evidence, that the employee has been rehabilitated for the purposes of schoolsite employment for at least one year. If the offense in question occurred outside this state, then the person may
 seek a finding of rehabilitation from the court in the local educational agency in which the employee is a resident.

(f) An entity having a contract as described in subdivision (a) or that is required to comply with this section for other employees pursuant to subdivision (c) shall certify in writing to the local educational agency that neither the employer nor any of its employees who are required by this section to submit or have their fingerprints submitted to the Department of Justice and who may interact with pupils have been convicted of a felony as defined in Section 45122.1.

(g) Where reasonable access to the statewide electronic fingerprinting network is available, the Department of Justice may mandate electronic submission of the fingerprint cards and other information
 required by this section.

(h) (1) For purposes of this section, an individual operating as a sole proprietor of an entity that has a contract with a local educational agency, as described in subdivision (a), shall be considered an employee of that entity.

(2) To protect the safety of any pupil that may interact with an employee of an entity that is a sole proprietorship and has a contract as described in subdivision (a) or that is required to comply with this section for other employees pursuant to subdivision (c), a local educational agency shall prepare and submit the employee’s fingerprints to the Department of Justice, as described in subdivision (a).

(i) For purposes of this section, “local
 educational agency” means a school district, educational joint powers authority, county office of education, or charter school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 313, Sec. 9.   (AB 2796)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

45125.2.

(a) A school district contracting with an entity for the construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, or repair of a school facility where the employees of the entity will have contact, other than limited contact, with pupils shall ensure the safety of the pupils by one or more of the following methods:

(1) The installation of a physical barrier at the worksite to limit contact with pupils.

(2) Continual supervision and monitoring of all employees of the entity by an employee of the entity whom the Department of Justice has ascertained has not been convicted of a violent or serious felony. For purposes of this paragraph, an employee of the entity may submit his or her fingerprints to the Department of Justice pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 45125.1 and the department shall comply with subdivision (d) of Section 45125.1.

(3) Surveillance of employees of the entity by school personnel.

(b) An entity that contracts with a school district for the construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, or repair of a school facility is not required to comply with the requirements of Section 45125.1 if one or more of the methods described in subdivision (a) is utilized.

(c) For purposes of this section, a violent felony is any felony listed in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 of the Penal Code and a serious felony is any felony listed in subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7 of the Penal Code.

(d) This section shall not apply to an entity providing construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, or repair services to a school district in an emergency or exceptional situation, such as when pupil health or safety is endangered or when repairs are needed to make school facilities safe and habitable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 840, Sec. 12.   Effective September 25, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

45125.5.

A school district or county office of education may request that a local law enforcement agency conduct an automated records check of a prospective noncertificated employee in order to ascertain whether the prospective noncertificated employee has a criminal record. If the local law enforcement agency agrees to provide that automated records check, the results therefrom shall be returned to the requesting district or county office of education within 72 hours of the written request. A local law enforcement agency may charge a fee to the requesting agency not to exceed the actual expense to the law enforcement agency. For purposes of this section, “prospective noncertificated employee” includes only those applicants whom the requesting school district intends to hire, at the time the automated records check is requested.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 152, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

45126.

Any provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding, the Department of Justice, shall, as provided in Section 45125, furnish, upon application of a local public law enforcement agency all information pertaining to any such person of whom there is a record in its office.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45127.

(a) The workweek of a classified employee, as defined in Section 45103 or 45256, shall be 40 hours. The workday shall be eight hours. These provisions do not restrict the extension of a regular workday or workweek on an overtime basis if it is necessary to carry on the business of the district. This section does not bar the district from establishing a workday of less than eight hours or a workweek of less than 40 hours for all or any of its classified positions.

(b) Notwithstanding this section and Section 45128, a governing board may, with the approval of the personnel commission, where applicable, exempt specific classes of positions from compensation for overtime in excess of eight hours in one day, provided that hours worked in excess of 40 in a calendar week shall be compensated on an overtime basis. This exemption applies only to those classes that the governing board and personnel commission, where applicable, specifically find to be subject to fluctuations in daily working hours not susceptible to administrative control, such as security patrol and recreation classes, but shall not include food service and transportation classes.

(c) This section applies to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 108.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

45128.

The governing board of each district shall provide the extent to which, and establish the method by which ordered overtime is compensated. The board shall provide for such compensation or compensatory time off at a rate at least equal to time and one-half the regular rate of pay of the employee designated and authorized to perform the overtime.

Overtime is defined to include any time required to be worked in excess of eight hours in any one day and in excess of 40 hours in any calendar week. If a governing board establishes a workday of less than eight hours but seven hours or more and a workweek of less than 40 hours but 35 hours or more for all of its classified positions or for certain classes of classified positions, all time worked in excess of the established workday and workweek shall be deemed to be overtime. The foregoing provisions do not apply to classified positions for which a workday of fewer than seven hours and a workweek of fewer than 35 hours has been established, nor to positions for which a workday of eight hours and a workweek of 40 hours has been established, but in which positions employees are temporarily assigned to work fewer than eight hours per day or 40 hours per week when such reduction in hours is necessary to avoid layoffs for lack of work or lack of funds and the consent of the majority of affected employees to such reduction in hours has been first obtained.

For the purpose of computing the number of hours worked, time during which an employee is excused from work because of holidays, sick leave, vacation, compensating time off, or other paid leave of absence shall be considered as time worked by the employee.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45129.

When compensatory time off is authorized in lieu of cash compensation, such compensatory time off shall be granted within 12 calendar months following the month in which the overtime was worked and without impairing the services rendered by the employing district.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45130.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 45127 and 45128, a personnel commission, when applicable, or a governing board of a school district may specify certain positions or classes of positions as supervisory, administrative, or executive and exclude the employees serving in such positions and the positions from the overtime provisions.

To be excluded from such overtime provisions, the positions or classes of positions must clearly and reasonably be management positions. In approving positions or classes of positions for exclusion from the overtime provisions, the personnel commission, when applicable, or the governing board of a school district shall certify, in writing, that the duties, flexibility of hours, salary, benefit structure, and authority of the positions or classes of positions are of such a nature that they should be set apart from those positions which are subject to the overtime provisions, and that employees serving in such excluded positions or classes of positions will not be unreasonably discriminated against as a result of the exclusion.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, if a person serving in an excluded position is required to work on a holiday, as provided for in this code, or by action of a governing board, he shall be paid, in addition to his regular pay for the holiday, compensation, or given compensating time off, at a rate not less than his normal rate of pay.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45131.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 45127, the workweek shall consist of not more than five consecutive working days for any employee having an average workday of four hours or more during the workweek. Such an employee shall be compensated for any work required to be performed on the sixth or seventh day following the commencement of the workweek at the rate equal to 112 times the regular rate of pay of the employee designated and authorized to perform the work.

An employee having an average workday of less than four hours during a workweek shall, for any work required to be performed on the seventh day following the commencement of his workweek, be compensated for at a rate equal to 112 times the regular rate of pay of the employee designated and authorized to perform the work.

Positions and employees excluded from overtime compensation pursuant to Section 45130 shall likewise be excluded from the provisions of this section.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45132.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 45131, a governing board of a district may establish a 10-hour-per-day, 40-hour, four-consecutive-day workweek for all, or certain classes of its employees, or for employees within a class when, by reason of the work location and duties actually performed by such employees, their services are not required for a workweek of five consecutive days, provided the establishment of such a workweek has the concurrence of the concerned employee, class of employees, or classes of employees as ascertained through the employee organization representing a majority of the concerned employees or class or classes, of employees, as determined by the payroll deduction authorizations for dues in classified employee organizations on file with the district on the last day of the month next preceding the date the board action was taken.

Where a board has previously established the workweek of not less than 35 hours, it may require the established workweek to be performed in four consecutive days by any class or classes of employees or by employees within a class, when by reason of the work location and duties actually performed by such employees their services are not required for a workweek of five consecutive days, with the concurrence of employee personnel as provided herein.

When a four-day workweek is established, the overtime rate shall be paid for all hours worked in excess of the required workday, which shall not exceed 10 hours. Work performed on the fifth, sixth and seventh days shall be compensated for at a rate equal to 112 times the regular rate of pay of the employee designated and authorized to perform the work.

An employee working an average workday of five hours or less during a workweek shall, for any work required to be performed on the sixth or seventh day following the commencement of his workweek, be compensated for at a rate equal to 112 times the regular rate of pay of the employee designated and authorized to perform the work.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45133.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 45127 and 45131, a governing board of a school district or a county superintendent of schools may establish a 9-hour-per-day, 80-hour-per-2-week work schedule, provided the establishment of the work schedule has the concurrence of the employee organization, or in the absence of an employee organization, the concurrence of the affected employee.

(b) When a 9-hour-per-day, 80-hour-per-2-week work schedule is established, it shall consist of nine work days, eight of which shall be nine-hour days, and one of which shall be an eight-hour day. The overtime rate shall be paid for all hours worked in excess of the required work day, which shall not exceed nine hours, at a rate equal to one and one-half times the regular rate of pay for the employee designated and authorized to perform the work.

(c) When a 9-hour-per-day, 80-hour-per-2-week work schedule is established, the workweek shall be defined in either of two ways, as follows:

(1) The workweek shall begin on noon Friday and will end at noon the following Friday, with the employee working nine hours each day except on alternate Thursdays when the employee will work eight hours, and on alternate Fridays when the employee will not work; or,

(2) The workweek shall begin at noon on any other day of the week and shall be defined so that no employee will be required to work more than 40 hours during any given workweek.

(d) This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 190, Sec. 1.   Effective June 29, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

45133.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 45127 and 45131, a governing board of a school district or a county superintendent of schools may establish a 12-hour-per-day, 80-hour-per-2-week work schedule for school police departments, provided the establishment of the work schedule
 is consented to in a valid collective bargaining agreement that contains all of the following:

(1) Express provisions for the wages, hours of work, and working conditions of employees.

(2) Express provisions for meal periods of employees, and final and binding arbitration of disputes concerning application of the meal period provisions.

(3) Premium wage rates for all overtime hours worked.

(4) A regular hourly rate of pay of not less than 30 percent more than the state minimum wage rate.

(b) When a 12-hour-per-day, 80-hour-per-2-week work schedule is established, it shall consist of seven work days, six of which shall be 12-hour days, and one of which shall be an eight-hour day. The overtime rate shall be paid for all hours worked in excess of the required workday, at a rate equal to one and one-half times the regular rate of pay for the employee designated and authorized to perform the work.

(c) When a
 12-hour-per-day, 80-hour-per-2-week work schedule is established, the workweek shall be defined so that no employee will be required to work more than 40 hours during any given workweek.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 73, Sec. 1.   (AB 226)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

45134.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, no minimum or maximum age limits shall be established for the employment or continuance in employment of persons as part of the classified service.

(b) Any person possessing all of the minimum qualifications for any employment shall be eligible for appointment to that employment, and no rule or policy, either written or unwritten, heretofore or hereafter adopted, shall prohibit the employment or continued employment, solely because of the age of any person in any school employment who is otherwise qualified.

(c) No person shall be employed in school employment while he or she is receiving a retirement allowance under any retirement system by reason of prior school employment, except that a person may be hired:

(1) Pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 21220) of Chapter 12 of Part 3 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(2) As an aide in one of the following circumstances:

(A) An aide is needed in a class with a high pupil-teacher ratio.

(B) An aide is needed to provide one-on-one instruction in remedial classes or for underprivileged students.

A person working as an aide pursuant to this subdivision shall not receive service credits for purposes of the State Teachers’ Retirement System.

(d) The provisions of subdivision (c) shall be inapplicable to persons who were employed in the classified service of any school district as of September 18, 1959, and who are still in the employ of the same district on the effective date of this subdivision, and the rights of those persons shall be fixed and determined as of September 18, 1959, and no such person shall be deprived of any right to any retirement allowance or eligibility for any such allowance to which he or she would have been entitled as of that date. Any such person who, by reason of any provision of law to the contrary, has been deprived of any right to retirement allowance or eligibility for such an allowance, shall, upon the filing of application therefor, be reinstated to such rights as he or she would have had had this subdivision been in effect on September 18, 1959.

(e) This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 351, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

45135.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (c) of Section 45134, a retired classified school employee may be employed by a school district, but only in accordance with the provisions of Article 5 (commencing with Section 21150) of Chapter 8 of Part 3 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45136.

All probationary and permanent part-time classified employees shall be entitled to sick leave, and all other benefits conferred by law on classified employees. Part-time employees shall be entitled to all leaves and benefits granted by the governing board to a majority of the regular full-time employees in the classified service of the district or to regular full-time employees in the same classified positions or general class of positions; but such leaves and benefits may be prorated in the same ratio as the regular work hours per day, days per week, weeks per month, or months per year of such part-time employees bear to eight hours per day, 40 hours per calendar week, four calendar weeks per month, or 12 calendar months during the school year.

Except for prorating benefits for part-time employees as herein authorized, the governing board shall provide at least the same benefits for all regular employees in the classified service as it provides for the majority of such employees.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the granting of additional benefits for some employees in recognition of nature of work, level of classification, or length of service.

This section shall not apply to employees properly designated as substitute, short-term, or limited-term employees, as defined in Sections 45103 and 45286 of this code, unless such employees are specifically included by a governing board, or by a personnel commission for those districts included under the provisions of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of this chapter.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of this chapter.

This section shall not apply to those benefits authorized under the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 53200) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45137.

A classified employee who works a minimum of 30 minutes per day in excess of his part-time assignment for a period of 20 consecutive working days or more, shall have his basic assignment changed to reflect the longer hours in order to acquire fringe benefits on a properly prorated basis as specified in Section 45136.

If a part-time employee’s average paid time, excluding overtime for which the employee receives compensation at a rate at least equal to time and one-half, exceeds his average assigned time by 50 minutes or more per working day in any quarter, the hours paid per day for compensable leaves of absence and holidays in the succeeding quarter shall be equivalent to the average hours paid per working day in the preceding quarter, excluding overtime.

Except where vacation entitlement is accrued on the basis of actual hours of paid regular service, vacation entitlement shall be based on the average number of hours worked per working day during the portion of the school year in which the employee is assigned to duty.

It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this section, to insure that part-time employees are accorded fringe benefits on an appropriate prorated basis with full recognition given to the number of hours worked by the part-time employee rather than on the basis of time fixed to the position when the fixed time is not reasonably correlated with the actual time worked. This section is to be liberally construed in order that the provisions of Section 45136 may not be circumvented by requiring employees to work in excess of the regularly fixed hours for a position on an overtime basis but for which premium pay is not provided nor appropriate adjustment is not made in fringe benefit entitlement.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45138.

The governing board of any school district may require the wearing of a distinctive uniform by classified personnel. The cost of the purchase, lease or rental of uniforms, equipment, identification badges, emblems, and cards required by the district shall be borne by the district.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45139.
